Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2112
Articles of incorporation; amendment.

No amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be made which increases the obligation of a member to make loans to the corporation or which makes any change in a principal amount, interest rate, maturity date, or in the security or credit position of any outstanding loan made by a member to the corporation or which affects the right of a member to withdraw from membership or the voting rights of such member without the consent of eighty percent of the members who would be affected by such amendment; Provided, that this section shall not be construed to authorize amendments of the articles of incorporation so as to give greater rights or powers to the corporation or lesser rights or powers to the members than are set forth in sections 21-2101 to 21-2117.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 12, p. 307.